Idaho, session 2025, H0117.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 41, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 67, Title 41, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 67
INSURANCE DATA SECURITY ACT
41-6701. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Insurance Data Security Act."
41-6702. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Authorized individual" means an individual known to and screened
by the licensee and determined to be necessary and appropriate to have access
to the nonpublic information held by the licensee and its information sys-
tems.
(2) "Consumer" means an individual, including but not limited to appli-
cants, policyholders, insureds, beneficiaries, claimants, and certificate
holders, who is a resident of this state and whose nonpublic information is
in a licensee's possession, custody, or control.
(3) "Cybersecurity event" means an event resulting in unauthorized ac-
cess to, disruption of, or misuse of an information system or nonpublic in-
formation stored on such information system. The term "cybersecurity event"
does not include:
(a) The unauthorized acquisition of encrypted nonpublic information if
the encryption, process, or key is not also acquired, released, or used
without authorization; or


(b) An event with regard to which the licensee has determined that the
nonpublic information accessed by an unauthorized person has not been
used or released and has been returned or destroyed.
(4) "Encrypted" means the transformation of data into a form that re-
sults in a low probability of assigning meaning without the use of a protec-
tive process or key.
(5) "Information security program" means the administrative, techni-
cal, and physical safeguards that a licensee uses to access, collect, dis-
tribute, process, protect, store, use, transmit, dispose of, or otherwise
handle nonpublic information.
(6) "Information system" means a discrete set of electronic informa-
tion resources organized for the collection, processing, maintenance, use,
sharing, dissemination, or disposition of electronic nonpublic informa-
tion, as well as any specialized system such as industrial process controls
systems, telephone switching and private branch exchange systems, and envi-
ronmental control systems.
(7) "Licensee" means any person who is licensed, authorized to operate,
or registered, or who is required to be licensed, authorized, or registered,
pursuant to the insurance laws of this state but does not include a purchas-
ing group or a risk retention group chartered and licensed in a state other
than this state or a person acting as an assuming insurer domiciled in an-
other state or jurisdiction.
(8) "Nonpublic information" means electronic information that is not
publicly available information and is:
(a) Business-related information of a licensee, the tampering with
which, or unauthorized disclosure, access, or use of which, would cause
a material adverse impact to the business, operations, or security of
the licensee;
(b) Any information concerning a consumer that because of name, number,
or other identifier can be used to identify such consumer, in combina-
tion with any one (1) or more of the following data elements:
(i) Social security number;
(ii) Driver's license number or nondriver identification card
number;
(iii) Financial account number or credit or debit card number;
(iv) Any security code, access code, or password that would permit
access to a consumer's financial account; or
(v) Biometric records; or
(c) Any information or data, except age or gender, in any form or medium
created by or derived from a health care provider or a consumer that
identifies a particular consumer and that relates to:
(i) The past, present, or future physical, mental, or behavioral
health or condition of any consumer or a member of the consumer's
family;
(ii) The provision of health care to any consumer; or
(iii) Payment for the provision of health care to any consumer.
(9) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in section 41-104, Idaho
Code.
(10)(a) "Publicly available information" means any information that a
licensee has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to


the general public from: federal, state, or local government records;
widely distributed media; or disclosures to the general public that are
required to be made by federal, state, or local law.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, a licensee has a reasonable ba-
sis to believe that information is lawfully made available to the gen-
eral public if the licensee has taken steps to determine:
(i) That the information is of the type that is available to the
general public; and
(ii) Whether a consumer can direct that the information not be
made available to the general public and, if so, that such consumer
has not done so.
(11) "State" means the state of Idaho or, when used in a context signify-
ing a jurisdiction other than the state of Idaho, any state, district, terri-
tory, commonwealth, or possession of the United States of America.
(12) "Third-party service provider" means a person, not otherwise de-
fined as a licensee, that contracts with a licensee to maintain, process, or
store nonpublic information or otherwise is permitted access to nonpublic
information through its provision of services to the licensee.
41-6703. INFORMATION SECURITY PROGRAM. (1) Commensurate with the
size and complexity of the licensee, the nature and scope of the licensee's
activities, including its use of third-party service providers, and the
sensitivity of the nonpublic information used by the licensee or in the
licensee's possession, custody, or control, each licensee must develop, im-
plement, and maintain a comprehensive written information security program
based on the licensee's risk assessment that contains administrative, tech-
nical, and physical safeguards for the protection of nonpublic information
and the licensee's information system.
(2) A licensee must require that any of its third-party service
providers implement appropriate administrative, technical, and physical
measures to protect and secure the information systems and nonpublic infor-
mation that are accessible to, or held by, a third-party service provider.
Nonpublic information is not accessible to, or held by, a third-party ser-
vice provider within the meaning of this section if it is encrypted and the
associated protective process or key necessary to assign meaning to the non-
public information is not within the possession of the third-party service
provider.
(3) As part of its information security program, each licensee must
establish a written incident response plan designed to promptly respond
to, and recover from, any cybersecurity event that compromises the con-
fidentiality, integrity, or availability of nonpublic information in its
possession, the licensee's information systems, or the continuing function-
ality of any aspect of the licensee's business or operations.
(4) Each licensee must maintain all records supporting its information
security program for a period of five (5) years. To the extent a licensee has
identified areas that require material improvement, the licensee must docu-
ment the identification and the remedial efforts planned and underway to ad-
dress such areas.


41-6704. INVESTIGATION OF A CYBERSECURITY EVENT. (1) If a licensee
learns that a cybersecurity event has or may have occurred, such licensee
or third-party service provider designated to act on behalf of the licensee
shall conduct a prompt investigation.
(2) During the investigation, the licensee or third-party service
provider designated to act on behalf of the licensee shall, to the extent
possible:
(a) Determine whether a cybersecurity event has occurred;
(b) Assess the nature and scope of the cybersecurity event;
(c) Identify any nonpublic information that may have been involved in
the cybersecurity event; and
(d) Perform or oversee reasonable measures to restore the security of
the information systems compromised in the cybersecurity event in order
to prevent further unauthorized acquisition, release, or use of nonpub-
lic information in the licensee's possession, custody, or control.
(3) If a licensee learns that a cybersecurity event has or may have oc-
curred that impacted the licensee's nonpublic information in a system main-
tained by a third-party service provider, the licensee shall complete the
steps provided in subsection (2) of this section or make reasonable efforts
to confirm and document that the third-party service provider has completed
such steps.
(4) A licensee shall maintain records concerning all cybersecurity
events for a period of at least five (5) years from the date of the cyberse-
curity event.
41-6705. NOTICE OF A CYBERSECURITY EVENT. (1) Each licensee must no-
tify the director as promptly, in the form and manner prescribed by the di-
rector, as reasonably practicable but not later than ten (10) business days
after a determination that a cybersecurity event has occurred when either:
(a) This state is the licensee's state of domicile, in the case of an in-
surer, or this state is the licensee's home state, in the case of a pro-
ducer, as those terms are defined in section 41-1003, Idaho Code, and
the cybersecurity event has a reasonable likelihood of materially harm-
ing:
(i) Any consumer residing in this state; or
(ii) Any material part of the normal operations of the licensee;
or
(b) The licensee reasonably believes that the nonpublic information
involved is of two hundred fifty (250) or more consumers residing in
this state and that the event is either:
(i) A cybersecurity event impacting the licensee of which notice
is required to be provided to any government body, self-regulatory
agency, or any other supervisory body pursuant to any state or fed-
eral law; or
(ii) A cybersecurity event that has a reasonable likelihood of ma-
terially harming:
1. Any consumer residing in this state; or
2. Any material part of the normal operations of the li-
censee.


(2) A licensee shall notify each consumer residing in this state with-
out unreasonable delay after a determination that a cybersecurity event has
occurred that is reasonably likely to result in material harm to that con-
sumer. Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, a licensee that
determines a cybersecurity event has occurred affecting data owned or li-
censed by another licensee must provide a notice to the owner or licensor of
the data affected by the cybersecurity event in place of the notification to
affected consumers.
(a) The licensee shall provide a copy of the notice sent to consumers to
the director.
(b) In determining whether a cybersecurity event is reasonably likely
to result in material harm to consumers residing in this state pursuant
to this subsection, a licensee shall act with the care an ordinarily
prudent person in like position would exercise under similar circum-
stances.
(c) A licensee may delay providing notice without violating the provi-
sions of this subsection if either:
(i) A delay is necessary in order for the licensee to take any mea-
sures necessary to determine the scope of the cybersecurity event
and restore the reasonable integrity of the information system.
However, the licensee must provide the notice required pursuant
to this section without unreasonable delay after the licensee com-
pletes the measures necessary to determine the scope of the cyber-
security event and restore the reasonable integrity of the infor-
mation system; or
(ii) A law enforcement agency determines and advises the licensee
that providing a notice will impede a criminal or civil investi-
gation or jeopardize homeland or national security. However, the
licensee must provide the notice required pursuant to this sec-
tion without unreasonable delay after the law enforcement agency
determines that providing the notice will no longer impede the in-
vestigation or jeopardize homeland or national security.
(3) In the case of a cybersecurity event impacting a licensee's nonpub-
lic information in a system maintained by a third-party service provider, of
which the licensee has become aware, the licensee must treat such event as
it would pursuant to subsection (1) of this section unless the third-party
service provider provides the notice required pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section to the director.
(a) The computation of the licensee's deadlines shall begin on the day
after the third-party service provider notifies the licensee of the cy-
bersecurity event or the licensee otherwise has actual knowledge of the
cybersecurity event, whichever is sooner.
(b) Nothing in this chapter prevents or abrogates an agreement between
a licensee and another licensee, a third-party service provider, or any
other party to fulfill any of the investigation requirements imposed
pursuant to section 41-6704, Idaho Code, or notice requirements imposed
pursuant to this section.
(4) As to notice of cybersecurity events of reinsurers to insurers:
(a) In the case of a cybersecurity event involving nonpublic infor-
mation that is used by or in the possession, custody, or control of a


licensee acting as an assuming insurer, including an assuming insurer
domiciled in another state or jurisdiction, and such licensee does not
have a direct contractual relationship with the affected consumers:
(i) The assuming insurer must notify its affected ceding insurers
and the insurance director of its state or jurisdiction of domi-
cile within ten (10) business days of making the determination
that a cybersecurity event has occurred; and
(ii) The ceding insurers that have a direct contractual relation-
ship with affected consumers must fulfill the consumer notifica-
tion requirements imposed pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion and any other notification requirements relating to a cyber-
security event imposed pursuant to this section.
(b) In the case of a cybersecurity event involving nonpublic informa-
tion that is in the possession, custody, or control of a third-party
service provider of a licensee that is an assuming insurer, including an
assuming insurer domiciled in another state or jurisdiction:
(i) The assuming insurer must notify its affected ceding insurers
and the insurance director of its state or jurisdiction of domi-
cile within ten (10) business days of receiving notice from its
third-party service provider that a cybersecurity event has oc-
curred; and
(ii) The ceding insurers that have a direct contractual relation-
ship with affected consumers must fulfill the consumer notifica-
tion requirements imposed pursuant to subsection (3) of this sec-
tion and any other notification requirements relating to a cyber-
security event imposed pursuant to this section.
(c) Any licensee acting as an assuming insurer shall not have any other
notice obligations relating to a cybersecurity event or other data
breach pursuant to this section.
(5) In the case of a cybersecurity event involving nonpublic infor-
mation that is in the possession, custody, or control of a licensee that
is an insurer or its third-party service provider for which a consumer ac-
cessed the insurer's services through an independent insurance producer,
and for which consumer notice is required pursuant to subsection (2) of
this section, the insurer must notify the producers of record of all af-
fected consumers of the cybersecurity event in a reasonable manner and at
a time reasonably concurrent with the time at which notice is provided to
the affected consumers. The insurer is excused from this obligation for
any producer or producer's representative who is not authorized by law or
contract to sell, solicit, or negotiate on behalf of the insurer and in those
instances in which the insurer does not have the current producer of record
information for any individual consumer.
41-6706. DIRECTOR'S POWER TO EXAMINE AND INVESTIGATE. (1) The direc-
tor shall have the power to examine and investigate the affairs of any li-
censee to determine whether the licensee has been or is engaged in any con-
duct in violation of the provisions of this chapter. This power is in ad-
dition to the powers of the director pursuant to chapter 2, title 41, Idaho
Code. Any such investigation or examination shall be conducted pursuant to
chapter 2, title 41, Idaho Code.


(2) If the director has reason to believe that a licensee has been or is
engaged in conduct in this state that violates the provisions of this chap-
ter, the director may take action that is necessary or appropriate to enforce
the provisions of this chapter.
41-6707. CONFIDENTIALITY AND SHARING OF DOCUMENTS, MATERIALS, AND
OTHER INFORMATION. (1) Any documents, materials, or other information in
the control or possession of the department that are furnished by a licensee
or an employee or agent thereof acting on behalf of a licensee pursuant to
section 41-6703 or 41-6705, Idaho Code, or that are obtained by the director
in an investigation or examination pursuant to section 41-6706, Idaho Code,
are confidential by law and privileged, are not subject to the Idaho public
records act, chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, are not subject to subpoena,
and are not subject to discovery or admissible as evidence in any private
civil action. However, the director is authorized to use the documents, ma-
terials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal
action brought as a part of the director's duties.
(2) Neither the director nor any person who received documents, materi-
als, or other information while acting under the authority of the director is
permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any
confidential documents, materials, or information subject to the provisions
of subsection (1) of this section.
(3) In order to assist in the performance of the director's duties under
this chapter, the director may:
(a) Share documents, materials, or other information, including the
confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information sub-
ject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, excluding
nonpublic information as defined in section 41-6702(8)(b) and (c),
Idaho Code, with other state, federal, and international regulatory
agencies, with the national association of insurance commissioners,
its affiliates or subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and interna-
tional law enforcement authorities, provided that the recipient agrees
in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the
document, material, or other information;
(b) Receive documents, materials, or information, including otherwise
confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, from
the national association of insurance commissioners, its affiliates or
subsidiaries and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other
foreign or domestic jurisdictions and must maintain as confidential or
privileged any document, material, or information received with notice
or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the
laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material,
or information;
(c) Share documents, materials, or other information subject to the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, excluding nonpublic in-
formation as defined in section 41-6702(8)(b) and (c), Idaho Code, with
a third-party consultant or vendor, provided the consultant agrees in
writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the
documents, materials, or other information; and


(d) Enter into agreements governing sharing and use of information con-
sistent with the provisions of this subsection.
(4) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality
in the documents, materials, or information will occur as a result of dis-
closure to the director pursuant to this section or as a result of sharing
as authorized pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. This includes all
protections from disclosure granted by the provisions of subsection (1) of
this section, including from disclosure pursuant to the Idaho public records
act, by subpoena, and through discovery or being admissible in evidence in
any private civil action.
(5) Nothing in this chapter prohibits the director from releasing fi-
nal, adjudicated actions that are open to public inspection pursuant to the
Idaho public records act or to a database or other clearinghouse service
maintained by the national association of insurance commissioners or its
affiliates or subsidiaries.
41-6708. EXCEPTIONS. (1) The following exceptions shall apply to this
chapter:
(a) A licensee is exempt from the provisions of section 41-6703, Idaho
Code, if:
(i) The licensee has fewer than fifty (50) employees who work at
least thirty (30) hours per week for the licensee;
(ii) The licensee has less than five million dollars ($5,000,000)
in gross annual revenue; or
(iii) The licensee has less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000)
in year-end total assets.
(b) A licensee that is subject to the health insurance portability and
accountability act of 1996 (HIPAA) and any amendments thereto, that has
established and maintains a written information security program pur-
suant to any statutes, rules, regulations, procedures, or guidelines
established under HIPAA, and that maintains nonpublic information in
the same manner as protected health information will be considered to
meet the requirements of this chapter except for the director notifica-
tion requirements pursuant to section 41-6705(1), Idaho Code.
(c) An employee, agent, representative, or designee of a licensee who
is also a licensee is exempt from the provisions of sections 41-6703,
41-6704, and 41-6705, Idaho Code, and need not develop its own informa-
tion security program to the extent that the employee, agent, represen-
tative, or designee is covered by the information security program of
the other licensee.
(d) A licensee that is a financial institution or affiliated with a
financial institution as defined in 15 U.S.C. 6809 that maintains an
information security program in compliance with the interagency guide-
lines establishing standards for safeguarding customer information as
set forth pursuant to 15 U.S.C. 6801 and 6805, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley
act, will be considered to meet the requirements of section 41-6703,
Idaho Code, with respect to establishing an information security pro-
gram, provided that the information security program includes the
protection of nonpublic information and the licensee's information
system, and provided that the licensee produces, upon request, docu-


mentation satisfactory to the director that independently validates
the financial institution or affiliated financial institution's adop-
tion of an information security program that satisfies the interagency
guidelines.
(e) A licensee that is in compliance with another jurisdiction's man-
dated written insurance data security requirements that are at least as
restrictive as this chapter will be considered to meet the requirements
of section 41-6703, Idaho Code, with respect to establishing an infor-
mation security program.
(2) In the event that a licensee ceases to qualify for an exception,
such licensee has one hundred eighty (180) days to comply with the provisions
of this chapter.
41-6709. NO PRIVATE CAUSE OF ACTION. The provisions of this chapter
shall not create or imply a private cause of action for violation of its pro-
visions or any rules promulgated pursuant to it.
41-6710. PENALTIES. In the case of a violation of the provisions of
this chapter, a licensee may be subject to civil penalties in accordance with
section 41-117, Idaho Code.
41-6711. EXCLUSIVE STATE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS. Notwithstanding
any other provision of law to the contrary, the provisions of this chapter
and any rules adopted pursuant to this chapter constitute the exclusive
state standards and requirements applicable to licensees regarding an in-
formation security program, cybersecurity events, the security of nonpublic
information, data security, investigation of cybersecurity events, notice
of cybersecurity events, and notification to the director of cybersecurity
events. The requirements of sections 28-51-104 through 28-51-107, Idaho
Code, shall not apply to a licensee.
41-6712. RULEMAKING AUTHORITY. The director may, subject to legisla-
tive approval, promulgate such rules as are necessary to carry out the provi-
sions of this chapter.
41-6713. CONSIDERATIONS WHEN ADMINISTERING. The director shall con-
sider the nature, scale, and complexity of licensees in administering the
provisions of this chapter and adopting rules pursuant to this chapter.
41-6714. EFFECTIVE DATE. This chapter shall take effect on July 1,
2025, provided that a licensee has until July 1, 2026, to comply with the
provisions of section 41-6703, Idaho Code.
41-6715. SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this chapter or the appli-
cation thereof to any person or circumstance is for any reason held to be in-
valid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of such provision to
other persons or circumstances will not be affected thereby.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.